Ohio, session 136, SB391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 124.15, 124.152, 3328.15, 3333.01, 3770.02, 4121.02, and 4905.10 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 124.15. (A) Board and commission members appointed prior to July 1, 1991, shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedules of rates: Schedule B Pay Ranges and Step Values 1 2 3 4 5 6 A Range Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 B 23 Hourly 5.72 5.91 6.10 6.31 C Annually 11897.60 12292.80 12688.00 13124.80 D Step 5 Step 6 E Hourly 6.52 6.75 F Annually 13561.60 14040.00 G Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 H 24 Hourly 6.00 6.20 6.41 6.63 I Annually 12480.00 12896.00 13332.80 13790.40 J Step 5 Step 6 K Hourly 6.87 7.10 L Annually 14289.60 14768.00 M Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 N 25 Hourly 6.31 6.52 6.75 6.99 O Annually 13124.80 13561.60 14040.00 14539.20 P Step 5 Step 6 Q Hourly 7.23 7.41 R Annually 15038.40 15412.80 S Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 T 26 Hourly 6.63 6.87 7.10 7.32 U Annually 13790.40 14289.60 14768.00 15225.60 V Step 5 Step 6 W Hourly 7.53 7.77 X Annually 15662.40 16161.60 Y Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Z 27 Hourly 6.99 7.23 7.41 7.64 AA Annually 14534.20 15038.40 15412.80 15891.20 AB Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 AC Hourly 7.88 8.15 8.46 AD Annually 16390.40 16952.00 17596.80 AE Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 AF 28 Hourly 7.41 7.64 7.88 8.15 AG Annually 15412.80 15891.20 16390.40 16952.00 AH Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 AI Hourly 8.46 8.79 9.15 AJ Annually 17596.80 18283.20 19032.00 AK Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 AL 29 Hourly 7.88 8.15 8.46 8.79 AM Annually 16390.40 16952.00 17596.80 18283.20 AN Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 AO Hourly 9.15 9.58 10.01 AP Annually 19032.00 19926.40 20820.80 AQ Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 AR 30 Hourly 8.46 8.79 9.15 9.58 AS Annually 17596.80 18283.20 19032.00 19926.40 AT Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 AU Hourly 10.01 10.46 10.99 AV Annually 20820.80 21756.80 22859.20 AW Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 AX 31 Hourly 9.15 9.58 10.01 10.46 AY Annually 19032.00 19962.40 20820.80 21756.80 AZ Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 BA Hourly 10.99 11.52 12.09 BB Annually 22859.20 23961.60 25147.20 BC Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 BD 32 Hourly 10.01 10.46 10.99 11.52 BE Annually 20820.80 21756.80 22859.20 23961.60 BF Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 BG Hourly 12.09 12.68 13.29 13.94 BH Annually 25147.20 26374.40 27643.20 28995.20 BI Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 BJ 33 Hourly 10.99 11.52 12.09 12.68 BK Annually 22859.20 23961.60 25147.20 26374.40 BL Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 BM Hourly 13.29 13.94 14.63 15.35 BN Annually 27643.20 28995.20 30430.40 31928.00 BO Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 BP 34 Hourly 12.09 12.68 13.29 13.94 BQ Annually 25147.20 26374.40 27643.20 28995.20 BR Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 BS Hourly 14.63 15.35 16.11 16.91 BT Annually 30430.40 31928.00 33508.80 35172.80 BU Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 BV 35 Hourly 13.29 13.94 14.63 15.35 BW Annually 27643.20 28995.20 30430.40 31928.00 BX Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 BY Hourly 16.11 16.91 17.73 18.62 BZ Annually 33508.80 35172.80 36878.40 38729.60 CA Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 CB 36 Hourly 14.63 15.35 16.11 16.91 CC Annually 30430.40 31928.00 33508.80 35172.80 CD Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 CE Hourly 17.73 18.62 19.54 20.51 CF Annually 36878.40 38729.60 40643.20 42660.80 Schedule C Pay Range and Values 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 10.44 15.72 C Annually 21715.20 32697.60 D 42 Hourly 11.51 17.35 E Annually 23940.80 36088.00 F 43 Hourly 12.68 19.12 G Annually 26374.40 39769.60 H 44 Hourly 13.99 20.87 I Annually 29099.20 43409.60 J 45 Hourly 15.44 22.80 K Annually 32115.20 47424.00 L 46 Hourly 17.01 24.90 M Annually 35380.80 51792.00 N 47 Hourly 18.75 27.18 O Annually 39000.00 56534.40 P 48 Hourly 20.67 29.69 Q Annually 42993.60 61755.20 R 49 Hourly 22.80 32.06 S Annually 47424.00 66684.80 (B) The pay schedule of all employees shall be on a biweekly basis, with amounts computed on an hourly basis. (C) Part-time employees shall be compensated on an hourly basis for time worked, at the rates shown in division (A) of this section or in section 124.152 of the Revised Code. (D) The salary and wage rates in division (A) of this section or in section 124.152 of the Revised Code represent base rates of compensation and may be augmented by the provisions of section 124.181 of the Revised Code. In those cases where lodging, meals, laundry, or other personal services are furnished an employee in the service of the state, the actual costs or fair market value of the personal services shall be paid by the employee in such amounts and manner as determined by the director of administrative services and approved by the director of budget and management, and those personal services shall not be considered as a part of the employee's compensation. An appointing authority that appoints employees in the service of the state, with the approval of the director of administrative services and the director of budget and management, may establish payments to employees for uniforms, tools, equipment, and other requirements of the department and payments for the maintenance of them. The director of administrative services may review collective bargaining agreements entered into under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code that cover employees in the service of the state and determine whether certain benefits or payments provided to the employees covered by those agreements should also be provided to employees in the service of the state who are exempt from collective bargaining coverage and are paid in accordance with section 124.152 of the Revised Code or are listed in division (B)(2) or (4) of section 124.14 of the Revised Code. On completing the review, the director of administrative services, with the approval of the director of budget and management, may provide to some or all of these employees any payment or benefit, except for salary, contained in such a collective bargaining agreement even if it is similar to a payment or benefit already provided by law to some or all of these employees. Any payment or benefit so provided shall not exceed the highest level for that payment or benefit specified in such a collective bargaining agreement. The director of administrative services shall not provide, and the director of budget and management shall not approve, any payment or benefit to such an employee under this division unless the payment or benefit is provided pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement to a state employee who is in a position with similar duties as, is supervised by, or is employed by the same appointing authority as, the employee to whom the benefit or payment is to be provided. As used in this division, "payment or benefit already provided by law" includes, but is not limited to, bereavement, personal, vacation, administrative, and sick leave, disability benefits, holiday pay, and pay supplements provided under the Revised Code, but does not include wages or salary. (E) New employees paid in accordance with schedule B of division (A) of this section or schedule E-1 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code shall be employed at the minimum rate established for the range unless otherwise provided. Employees with qualifications that are beyond the minimum normally required for the position and that are determined by the director to be exceptional may be employed in, or may be transferred or promoted to, a position at an advanced step of the range. Further, in time of a serious labor market condition when it is relatively impossible to recruit employees at the minimum rate for a particular classification, the entrance rate may be set at an advanced step in the range by the director of administrative services. This rate may be limited to geographical regions of the state. Appointments made to an advanced step under the provision regarding exceptional qualifications shall not affect the step assignment of employees already serving. However, anytime the hiring rate of an entire classification is advanced to a higher step, all incumbents of that classification being paid at a step lower than that being used for hiring, shall be advanced beginning at the start of the first pay period thereafter to the new hiring rate, and any time accrued at the lower step will be used to calculate advancement to a succeeding step. If the hiring rate of a classification is increased for only a geographical region of the state, only incumbents who work in that geographical region shall be advanced to a higher step. When an employee in the unclassified service changes from one state position to another or is appointed to a position in the classified service, or if an employee in the classified service is appointed to a position in the unclassified service, the employee's salary or wage in the new position shall be determined in the same manner as if the employee were an employee in the classified service. When an employee in the unclassified service who is not eligible for step increases is appointed to a classification in the classified service under which step increases are provided, future step increases shall be based on the date on which the employee last received a pay increase. If the employee has not received an increase during the previous year, the date of the appointment to the classified service shall be used to determine the employee's annual step advancement eligibility date. In reassigning any employee to a classification resulting in a pay range increase or to a new pay range as a result of a promotion, an increase pay range adjustment, or other classification change resulting in a pay range increase, the director shall assign such employee to the step in the new pay range that will provide an increase of approximately four per cent if the new pay range can accommodate the increase. When an employee is being assigned to a classification or new pay range as the result of a class plan change, if the employee has completed a probationary period, the employee shall be placed in a step no lower than step two of the new pay range. If the employee has not completed a probationary period, the employee may be placed in step one of the new pay range. Such new salary or wage shall become effective on such date as the director determines. (F) If employment conditions and the urgency of the work require such action, the director of administrative services may, upon the application of a department head, authorize payment at any rate established within the range for the class of work, for work of a casual or intermittent nature or on a project basis. Payment at such rates shall not be made to the same individual for more than three calendar months in any one calendar year. Any such action shall be subject to the approval of the director of budget and management as to the availability of funds. This section and sections 124.14 and 124.152 of the Revised Code do not repeal any authority of any department or public official to contract with or fix the compensation of professional persons who may be employed temporarily for work of a casual nature or for work on a project basis. (G)(1) Except as provided in divisions (G)(2) and (3) of this section, each state employee paid in accordance with schedule B of this section or schedule E-1 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code shall be eligible for advancement to succeeding steps in the range for the employee's class or grade according to the schedule established in this division. Beginning on the first day of the pay period within which the employee completes the prescribed probationary period in the employee's classification with the state, each employee shall receive an automatic salary adjustment equivalent to the next higher step within the pay range for the employee's class or grade. Except as provided in divisions (G)(2) and (3) of this section, each employee paid in accordance with schedule E-1 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code shall be eligible to advance to the next higher step until the employee reaches the top step in the range for the employee's class or grade, if the employee has maintained satisfactory performance in accordance with criteria established by the employee's appointing authority. Those step advancements shall not occur more frequently than once in any twelve-month period. When an employee is promoted, the step entry date shall be set to account for a probationary period. When an employee is reassigned to a higher pay range, the step entry date shall be set to allow an employee who is not at the highest step of the range to receive a step advancement one year from the reassignment date. Step advancement shall not be affected by demotion. A promoted employee shall advance to the next higher step of the pay range on the first day of the pay period in which the required probationary period is completed. Step advancement shall become effective at the beginning of the pay period within which the employee attains the necessary length of service. Time spent on authorized leave of absence shall be counted for this purpose. If determined to be in the best interest of the state service, the director of administrative services may, either statewide or in selected agencies, adjust the dates on which annual step advancements are received by employees paid in accordance with schedule E-1 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) There shall be a moratorium on annual step advancements under division (G)(1) of this section beginning June 21, 2009, through June 20, 2011. Step advancements shall resume with the pay period beginning June 21, 2011. Upon the resumption of step advancements, there shall be no retroactive step advancements for the period the moratorium was in effect. The moratorium shall not affect an employee's performance evaluation schedule. An employee who begins a probationary period before June 21, 2009, shall advance to the next step in the employee's pay range at the end of probation, and then become subject to the moratorium. An employee who is hired, promoted, or reassigned to a higher pay range between June 21, 2009, through June 20, 2011, shall not advance to the next step in the employee's pay range until the next anniversary of the employee's date of hire, promotion, or reassignment that occurs on or after June 21, 2011. (b) The moratorium under division (G)(2)(a) of this section shall apply to the employees of the secretary of state, the auditor of state, the treasurer of state, and the attorney general, who are subject to this section unless the secretary of state, the auditor of state, the treasurer of state, or the attorney general decides to exempt the office's employees from the moratorium and so notifies the director of administrative services in writing on or before July 1, 2009. (3) Employees in intermittent positions shall be employed at the minimum rate established for the pay range for their classification and are not eligible for step advancements. (H) Employees in appointive managerial or professional positions paid in accordance with schedule C of this section or schedule E-2 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code may be appointed at any rate within the appropriate pay range. This rate of pay may be adjusted higher or lower within the respective pay range at any time the appointing authority so desires as long as the adjustment is based on the employee's ability to successfully administer those duties assigned to the employee. Salary adjustments shall not be made more frequently than once in any six-month period under this provision to incumbents holding the same position and classification. (I) When an employee is assigned to duty outside this state, the employee may be compensated, upon request of the department head and with the approval of the director of administrative services, at a rate not to exceed fifty per cent in excess of the employee's current base rate for the period of time spent on that duty. (J) Unless compensation for members of a board or commission is otherwise specifically provided by law, the director of administrative services shall establish the rate and method of payment for members of boards and commissions pursuant to the pay schedules listed in section 124.152 of the Revised Code. However, compensation for a member of a board or commission who is appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate on or after the effective date of this amendment shall be established in accordance with division (E) of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. (K) Regular full-time employees in positions assigned to classes within the instruction and education administration series under the job classification plans of the director of administrative services, except certificated employees on the instructional staff of Ohio deaf and blind education services, whose positions are scheduled to work on the basis of an academic year rather than a full calendar year, shall be paid according to the pay range assigned by the applicable job classification plan, but only during those pay periods included in the academic year of the school where the employee is located. (1) Part-time or substitute teachers or those whose period of employment is other than the full academic year shall be compensated for the actual time worked at the rate established by this section. (2) Employees governed by this division are exempt from sections 124.13 and 124.19 of the Revised Code. (3) Length of service for the purpose of determining eligibility for step advancements as provided by division (G) of this section and for the purpose of determining eligibility for longevity pay supplements as provided by division (E) of section 124.181 of the Revised Code shall be computed on the basis of one full year of service for the completion of each academic year. (L) The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall, subject to the approval of the director of education and workforce, carry out both of the following: (1) Annually, between the first day of April and the last day of June, establish for the ensuing fiscal year a schedule of hourly rates for the compensation of each certificated employee on the instructional staff of Ohio deaf and blind education services constructed as follows: (a) Determine for each level of training, experience, and other professional qualification for which an hourly rate is set forth in the current schedule, the per cent that rate is of the rate set forth in such schedule for a teacher with a bachelor's degree and no experience. If there is more than one such rate for such a teacher, the lowest rate shall be used to make the computation. (b) Determine which six city, local, and exempted village school districts with territory in Franklin county have in effect on, or have adopted by, the first day of April for the school year that begins on the ensuing first day of July, teacher salary schedules with the highest minimum salaries for a teacher with a bachelor's degree and no experience; (c) Divide the sum of such six highest minimum salaries by ten thousand five hundred sixty; (d) Multiply each per cent determined in division (L)(1)(a) of this section by the quotient obtained in division (L)(1)(c) of this section; (e) One hundred five per cent of each product thus obtained shall be the hourly rate for the corresponding level of training, experience, or other professional qualification in the schedule for the ensuing fiscal year. (2) Annually, assign each certificated employee on the instructional staff of Ohio deaf and blind education services to an hourly rate on the schedule that is commensurate with the employee's training, experience, and other professional qualifications. If an employee is employed on the basis of an academic year, the employee's annual salary shall be calculated by multiplying the employee's assigned hourly rate times one thousand seven hundred sixty. If an employee is not employed on the basis of an academic year, the employee's annual salary shall be calculated in accordance with the following formula: (a) Multiply the number of days the employee is required to work pursuant to the employee's contract by eight; (b) Multiply the product of division (L)(2)(a) of this section by the employee's assigned hourly rate. Each employee shall be paid an annual salary in biweekly installments. The amount of each installment shall be calculated by dividing the employee's annual salary by the number of biweekly installments to be paid during the year. Sections 124.13 and 124.19 of the Revised Code do not apply to an employee who is paid under this division. As used in this division, "academic year" means the number of days in each school year that the state school for the deaf and the state school for the blind are required to be open for instruction with pupils in attendance. Upon completing an academic year, an employee paid under this division shall be deemed to have completed one year of service. An employee paid under this division is eligible to receive a pay supplement under division (L)(1), (2), or (3) of section 124.181 of the Revised Code for which the employee qualifies, but is not eligible to receive a pay supplement under division (L)(4) or (5) of that section. An employee paid under this division is eligible to receive a pay supplement under division (L)(6) of section 124.181 of the Revised Code for which the employee qualifies, except that the supplement is not limited to a maximum of five per cent of the employee's regular base salary in a calendar year. (M) Division (A) of this section does not apply to "exempt employees," as defined in section 124.152 of the Revised Code, who are paid under that section. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, when an employee transfers between bargaining units or transfers out of or into a bargaining unit, the director of administrative services shall establish the employee's compensation and adjust the maximum leave accrual schedule as the director deems equitable. Sec. 124.152. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, each exempt employee shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of division (B) of this section. (2) Each exempt employee who holds a position in the unclassified civil service pursuant to division (A)(26) or (30) of section 124.11 of the Revised Code may be paid a salary or wage in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of division (B) of this section, as applicable. (B)(1) Each exempt employee who must be paid in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of this section shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedule of rates as of the pay period that includes July 1, 2024: Schedule E-1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A Pay Ranges and Step Values B C Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 D Range 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A 1 Hourly 13.52 14.13 14.72 15.37 B Annually 28122 29390 30618 31970 C 2 Hourly 16.41 17.10 17.83 18.63 D Annually 34133 35568 37086 38750 E 3 Hourly 17.20 17.97 18.76 19.56 F Annually 35776 37378 39021 40685 G 4 Hourly 18.05 18.86 19.77 20.62 H Annually 37544 39229 41122 42890 I 5 Hourly 18.94 19.80 20.62 21.54 J Annually 39395 41184 42890 44803 K 6 Hourly 19.95 20.79 21.68 22.59 L Annually 41496 43243 45094 46987 M 7 Hourly 21.18 21.97 22.88 23.68 24.58 N Annually 44054 45698 47590 49254 51126 O 8 Hourly 22.40 23.39 24.40 25.50 26.70 P Annually 46592 48651 50752 53040 55536 Q 9 Hourly 23.89 25.14 26.37 27.69 29.09 R Annually 49691 52291 54850 57595 60507 S 10 Hourly 25.76 27.18 28.64 30.30 31.91 T Annually 53581 56534 59571 63024 66373 U 11 Hourly 28.08 29.69 31.42 33.19 35.07 V Annually 58406 61755 65354 69035 72946 W 12 Hourly 30.96 32.71 34.46 36.36 38.38 40.48 42.13 44.11 X Annually 64397 68037 71677 75629 79830 84198 87630 91749 Y 13 Hourly 34.14 36.00 37.97 40.02 42.27 44.55 46.38 48.56 Z Annually 71011 74880 78978 83242 87922 92664 96470 101005 AA 14 Hourly 37.53 39.67 41.80 44.07 46.56 49.15 51.19 53.58 AB Annually 78062 82514 86944 91666 96845 102232 106475 111446 AC 15 Hourly 41.23 43.55 46.01 48.54 51.23 54.04 56.26 58.91 AD Annually 85758 90584 95701 100963 106558 112403 117021 122533 AE 16 Hourly 45.45 47.99 50.62 53.47 56.40 59.63 62.08 64.98 AF Annually 94536 99819 105290 111218 117312 124030 129126 135158 AG 17 Hourly 50.09 52.85 55.81 58.88 62.19 65.66 69.27 AH Annually 104187 109928 116085 122470 129355 136573 144082 AI 18 Hourly 55.20 58.25 61.54 64.92 68.51 72.35 AJ Annually 114816 121160 128003 135034 142501 150488 AK 19 Hourly 60.72 64.37 67.69 71.41 75.37 79.58 AL Annually 126298 133890 140795 148533 156770 165526 Schedule E-2 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 16.23 54.57 C Annually 33758 113506 D 42 Hourly 17.89 60.25 E Annually 37211 125320 F 43 Hourly 19.70 66.35 G Annually 40976 138008 H 44 Hourly 21.73 72.49 I Annually 45198 150779 J 45 Hourly 24.01 79.15 K Annually 49941 164632 L 46 Hourly 26.43 86.50 M Annually 54974 179920 N 47 Hourly 29.14 94.41 O Annually 60611 196373 P 48 Hourly 32.14 102.98 Q Annually 66851 214198 R 49 Hourly 35.44 111.20 S Annually 73715 231296 (2) Each exempt employee who must be paid in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of this section shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedule of rates as of the pay period that includes July 1, 2025: Schedule E-1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A Pay Ranges and Step Values B Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 C Range 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A 1 Hourly 14.13 14.77 15.38 16.06 B Annually 29390 30722 31990 33405 C 2 Hourly 17.15 17.87 18.63 19.47 D Annually 35672 37170 38750 40498 E 3 Hourly 17.97 18.78 19.60 20.44 F Annually 37378 39062 40768 42515 G 4 Hourly 18.86 19.71 20.66 21.55 H Annually 39229 40997 42973 44824 I 5 Hourly 19.79 20.69 21.55 22.51 J Annually 41163 43035 44824 46821 K 6 Hourly 20.85 21.73 22.66 23.61 L Annually 43368 45198 47133 49109 M 7 Hourly 22.13 22.96 23.91 24.75 25.69 N Annually 46030 47757 49733 51480 53435 O 8 Hourly 23.41 24.44 25.50 26.65 27.90 P Annually 48693 50835 53040 55432 58032 Q 9 Hourly 24.97 26.27 27.56 28.94 30.40 R Annually 51938 54642 57325 60195 63232 S 10 Hourly 26.92 28.40 29.93 31.66 33.35 T Annually 55994 59072 62254 65853 69368 U 11 Hourly 29.34 31.03 32.83 34.68 36.65 V Annually 61027 64542 68286 72134 76232 W 12 Hourly 32.35 34.18 36.01 38.00 40.11 42.30 44.03 46.09 X Annually 67288 71094 74901 79040 83429 87984 91582 95867 Y 13 Hourly 35.68 37.62 39.68 41.82 44.17 46.55 48.47 50.75 Z Annually 74214 78250 82534 86986 91874 96824 100818 105560 AA 14 Hourly 39.22 41.46 43.68 46.05 48.66 51.36 53.49 55.99 AB Annually 81578 86237 90854 95784 101213 106829 111259 116459 AC 15 Hourly 43.09 45.51 48.08 50.72 53.54 56.47 58.79 61.56 AD Annually 89627 94661 100006 105498 111363 117458 122283 128045 AE 16 Hourly 47.50 50.15 52.90 55.88 58.94 62.31 64.87 67.90 AF Annually 98800 104312 110032 116230 122595 129605 134930 141232 AG 17 Hourly 52.34 55.23 58.32 61.53 64.99 68.61 72.39 AH Annually 108867 114878 121306 127982 135179 142709 150571 AI 18 Hourly 57.68 60.87 64.31 67.84 71.59 75.61 AJ Annually 119974 126610 133765 141107 148907 157269 AK 19 Hourly 63.45 67.27 70.74 74.62 78.76 83.16 AL Annually 131976 139922 147139 155210 163821 172973 Schedule E-2 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 16.23 57.03 C Annually 33758 118622 D 42 Hourly 17.89 62.96 E Annually 37211 130957 F 43 Hourly 19.70 69.34 G Annually 40976 144227 H 44 Hourly 21.73 75.75 I Annually 45198 157560 J 45 Hourly 24.01 82.71 K Annually 49941 172037 L 46 Hourly 26.43 90.39 M Annually 54974 188011 N 47 Hourly 29.14 98.66 O Annually 60611 205213 P 48 Hourly 32.14 107.61 Q Annually 66851 223829 R 49 Hourly 35.44 116.20 S Annually 73715 241696 (3) Each exempt employee who must be paid in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of this section shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedule of rates as of the pay period that includes July 1, 2026: Schedule E-1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A Pay Ranges and Step Values B Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 C Range D 1 Hourly 14.55 15.21 15.84 16.54 E Annually 30264 31637 32947 34403 F 2 Hourly 17.66 18.41 19.19 20.05 G Annually 36733 38293 39915 41704 H 3 Hourly 18.51 19.34 20.19 21.05 I Annually 38501 40227 41995 43784 J 4 Hourly 19.43 20.30 21.28 22.20 K Annually 40414 42224 44262 46176 L 5 Hourly 20.38 21.31 22.20 23.19 M Annually 42390 44325 46176 48235 N 6 Hourly 21.48 22.38 23.34 24.32 O Annually 44678 46550 48547 50586 P 7 Hourly 22.79 23.65 24.63 25.49 26.46 Q Annually 47403 49192 51230 53019 55037 R 8 Hourly 24.11 25.17 26.27 27.45 28.74 S Annually 50149 52354 54642 57096 59779 T 9 Hourly 25.72 27.06 28.39 29.81 31.31 U Annually 53498 56285 59051 62005 65125 V 10 Hourly 27.73 29.25 30.83 32.61 34.35 W Annually 57678 60840 64126 67829 71448 X 11 Hourly 30.22 31.96 33.81 35.72 37.75 Y Annually 62858 66477 70325 74298 78520 Z 12 Hourly 33.32 35.21 37.09 39.14 41.31 43.57 45.35 47.47 AA Annually 69306 73237 77147 81411 85925 90626 94328 98738 AB 13 Hourly 36.75 38.75 40.87 43.07 45.50 47.95 49.92 52.27 AC Annually 76440 80600 85010 89586 94640 99736 103834 108722 AD 14 Hourly 40.40 42.70 44.99 47.43 50.12 52.90 55.09 57.67 AE Annually 84032 88816 93579 98654 104250 110032 114587 119954 AF 15 Hourly 44.38 46.88 49.52 52.24 55.15 58.16 60.55 63.41 AG Annually 92310 97510 103002 108659 114712 120973 125944 131893 AH 16 Hourly 48.93 51.65 54.49 57.56 60.71 64.18 66.82 69.94 AI Annually 101774 107432 113339 119725 126277 133494 138986 145475 AJ 17 Hourly 53.91 56.89 60.07 63.38 66.94 70.67 74.56 AK Annually 112133 118331 124946 131830 139235 146994 155085 AL 18 Hourly 59.41 62.70 66.24 69.88 73.74 77.88 AM Annually 123573 130416 137779 145350 153379 161990 AN 19 Hourly 65.35 69.29 72.86 76.86 81.12 85.65 AO Annually 135928 144123 151549 159869 168730 178152 Schedule E-2 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 16.23 58.74 C Annually 33758 122179 D 42 Hourly 17.89 64.85 E Annually 37211 134888 F 43 Hourly 19.70 71.42 G Annually 40976 148554 H 44 Hourly 21.73 78.02 I Annually 45198 162282 J 45 Hourly 24.01 85.19 K Annually 49941 177195 L 46 Hourly 26.43 93.10 M Annually 54974 193648 N 47 Hourly 29.14 101.62 O Annually 60611 211370 P 48 Hourly 32.14 110.84 Q Annually 66851 230547 R 49 Hourly 35.44 119.69 S Annually 73715 248955 (C) As used in this section: (1) "Exempt employee" means a permanent full-time or permanent part-time employee paid directly by warrant of the director of budget and management whose position is included in the job classification plan established under division (A) of section 124.14 of the Revised Code but who is not considered a public employee for the purposes of Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. "Exempt employee" also includes a permanent full-time or permanent part-time employee of the secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general who has not been placed in an appropriate bargaining unit by the state employment relations board. (2) "Base rate of pay" means the rate of pay established under schedule E-1 of this section, plus the supplement provided under division (E) of section 124.181 of the Revised Code, plus any supplements enacted into law that are added to schedule E-1 of this section. (D) Notwithstanding any division of this section to the contrary, or division (E) or (G) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code with respect to requirements for step placement and advancement, no exempt employee other than a captain or equivalent officer in the state highway patrol shall be placed in step value 7 in range 17 of schedule E-1 of division (B) of this section. (E) Notwithstanding any division of this section or section 124.15 of the Revised Code to the contrary, all of the following apply: (1) No full-time exempt employee who is appointed by the governor subject to the advice and consent of the senate on or after the effective date of this amendment shall be paid an annual salary greater than one hundred thousand dollars. (2) No part-time exempt employee who is appointed by the governor subject to the advice and consent of the senate on or after the effective date of this amendment shall be paid an hourly rate greater than forty-eight dollars and eight cents per hour. (3) At the time the governor transmits the name of a proposed appointee to the senate for the senate's advice and consent, the governor also shall transmit the proposed salary or wage for the appointee. Sec. 3328.15. (A) Each college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of up to twenty-five members. Five of those members shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor's appointments may be based on nonbinding recommendations made by the director of education and workforce. Of the remaining members, initial members shall be appointed by the school's operator and future members shall be appointed pursuant to the bylaws adopted under section 3328.13 of the Revised Code. The governor, operator, or any other person or entity who appoints a member of the board of trustees under this section or the bylaws adopted under section 3328.13 of the Revised Code may remove that member from the board at any time. (B) The terms of office of the initial members shall be as follows: (1) Two members appointed by the governor shall serve for an initial term of three years. (2) Two members appointed by the governor shall serve for an initial term of two years. (3) One member appointed by the governor shall serve for an initial term of one year. (4) One-third of the members appointed by the operator, rounded down to the nearest whole number, shall serve for an initial term of three years. (5) One-third of the members appointed by the operator, rounded down to the nearest whole number, shall serve for an initial term of two years. (6) One-third of the members appointed by the operator, rounded down to the nearest whole number, shall serve for an initial term of one year. (7) Any remaining members appointed by the operator shall serve for an initial term of one year. Thereafter the terms of office of all members shall be for three years. The beginning date and ending date of terms of office shall be as prescribed by the school's operator, unless modified in the bylaws adopted under section 3328.13 of the Revised Code. (C) Vacancies on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointments. A member appointed to an unexpired term shall serve for the remainder of that term and may be reappointed subject to division (D) of this section. (D) No member may serve for more than three consecutive three-year terms. (E) The officers of the board shall be selected by and from among the members of the board. (F) Compensation Except as otherwise provided in this division, compensation for the members of the board, if any, shall be as prescribed in the bylaws adopted under section 3328.13 of the Revised Code. Any compensation set in those bylaws shall be set in accordance with division (E) of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. (G) It shall be construed that any contract entered into by the board of trustees or any officer or trustee of a college-preparatory boarding school, including, but not limited to, an agreement or contract required by section 3318.08, 3318.60, or 3318.61 of the Revised Code, is entered into by such individuals in their official capacities as representatives of the college-preparatory boarding school. No officer, trustee, or member of the board of trustees of a college-preparatory boarding school incurs any personal liability by virtue of section 3318.08, 3318.60, or 3318.61 of the Revised Code or the entering into any contract on behalf of the school. Sec. 3333.01. (A) There is hereby created the department of higher education, which shall be composed of the chancellor of higher education and the chancellor's employees, agents, and representatives. The chancellor shall perform the functions, exercise the powers, and discharge the duties as are assigned to the chancellor by law. (B) The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the chancellor of higher education. The chancellor shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, and the governor shall prescribe the chancellor's duties in addition to the chancellor's duties prescribed by law. The governor shall fix the compensation for the chancellor. For any chancellor appointed on or after the effective date of this amendment, in fixing the chancellor's compensation, the governor shall comply with division (E) of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. The chancellor shall be a member of the governor's cabinet. (C) The chancellor is responsible for appointing and fixing the compensation of all professional, administrative, and clerical employees and staff members necessary to assist in the performance of the chancellor's duties. All employees and staff shall serve at the chancellor's pleasure. (D) The chancellor shall be a person qualified by training and experience to understand the problems and needs of the state in the field of higher education and to devise programs, plans, and methods of solving the problems and meeting the needs. (E) Neither the chancellor nor any staff member or employee of the chancellor shall be a trustee, officer, or employee of any public or private college or university while serving as chancellor, staff member, or employee. Sec. 3770.02. (A) Subject to the advice and consent of the senate, the governor shall appoint a director of the state lottery commission who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall devote full time to the duties of the office and shall hold no other office or employment. The director shall meet all requirements for appointment as a member of the commission and shall, by experience and training, possess management skills that equip the director to administer an enterprise of the nature of a state lottery. The director shall receive an annual salary in accordance with pay range 48 and division (E) of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The director shall attend all meetings of the commission and shall act as its secretary. The director shall keep a record of all commission proceedings and shall keep the commission's records, files, and documents at the commission's principal office. All records of the commission's meetings shall be available for inspection by any member of the public, upon a showing of good cause and prior notification to the director. (2) The director shall be the commission's executive officer and shall be responsible for keeping all commission records and supervising and administering the state lottery in accordance with this chapter, and carrying out all commission rules adopted under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The director shall appoint deputy directors as necessary and as many regional managers as are required. The director may also appoint necessary professional, technical, and clerical assistants. All such officers and employees shall be appointed and compensated pursuant to Chapter 124. of the Revised Code. Regional and assistant regional managers, sales representatives, and any lottery executive account representatives shall remain in the unclassified service. The assistant director shall act as director in the absence or disability of the director. If the director does not appoint an assistant director, the director shall designate a deputy director to act as director in the absence or disability of the director. (2) The director, in consultation with the director of administrative services, may establish standards of proficiency and productivity for commission field representatives. (D) The director shall request the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, the department of public safety, or any other state, local, or federal agency to supply the director with the criminal records of any job applicant and may periodically request the criminal records of commission employees. At or prior to the time of making such a request, the director shall require a job applicant or commission employee to obtain fingerprint cards prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation at a qualified law enforcement agency, and the director shall cause these fingerprint cards to be forwarded to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The commission shall assume the cost of obtaining the fingerprint cards and shall pay to each agency supplying criminal records for each investigation under this division a reasonable fee, as determined by the agency. (E) The director shall license lottery sales agents pursuant to section 3770.05 of the Revised Code and, when it is considered necessary, may revoke or suspend the license of any lottery sales agent. The director may license video lottery technology providers, independent testing laboratories, and gaming employees, and promulgate rules relating thereto. When the director considers it necessary, the director may suspend or revoke the license of a video lottery technology provider, independent testing laboratory, or gaming employee, including suspension or revocation without affording an opportunity for a prior hearing under section 119.07 of the Revised Code when the public safety, convenience, or trust requires immediate action. (F) The director shall confer at least once each month with the commission, at which time the director shall advise it regarding the operation and administration of the lottery. The director shall make available at the request of the commission all documents, files, and other records pertaining to the operation and administration of the lottery. The director shall prepare and make available to the commission each month a complete and accurate accounting of lottery revenues, prize money disbursements and the cost of goods and services awarded as prizes, operating expenses, and all other relevant financial information, including an accounting of all transfers made from any lottery funds in the custody of the treasurer of state to benefit education. (G) The director may enter into contracts for the operation or promotion of the lottery pursuant to Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Pursuant to rules adopted by the commission under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code, the director shall require any lottery sales agents to deposit to the credit of the state lottery fund, in banking institutions designated by the treasurer of state, net proceeds due the commission as determined by the director. (2) Pursuant to rules adopted by the commission under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director may impose penalties for the failure of a sales agent to transfer funds to the commission in a timely manner. Penalties may include monetary penalties, immediate suspension or revocation of a license, or any other penalty the commission adopts by rule. (I) The director may arrange for any person, or any banking institution, to perform functions and services in connection with the operation of the lottery as the director may consider necessary to carry out this chapter. (J)(1) As used in this chapter, "statewide joint lottery game" means a lottery game that the commission sells solely within this state under an agreement with other lottery jurisdictions to sell the same lottery game solely within their statewide or other jurisdictional boundaries. (2) If the governor directs the director to do so, the director shall enter into an agreement with other lottery jurisdictions to conduct statewide joint lottery games. If the governor signs the agreement personally or by means of an authenticating officer pursuant to section 107.15 of the Revised Code, the director then may conduct statewide joint lottery games under the agreement. (3) The entire net proceeds from any statewide joint lottery games shall be used to fund elementary, secondary, vocational, and special education programs in this state. (4) The commission shall conduct any statewide joint lottery games in accordance with rules it adopts under division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) The director shall enter into an agreement with the department of mental health and addiction services behavioral health under which the department shall provide a program of gambling addiction services on behalf of the commission. The commission shall pay the costs of the program provided pursuant to the agreement. (2) As used in this section, "gambling addiction services" has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4121.02. (A) There is hereby created the industrial commission. The commission shall consist of three members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. One member shall be an individual who, on account of the individual's previous vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be classed as a representative of employers; one shall be an individual who, on account of the individual's previous vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be classed as a representative of employees; and one shall be an individual who, on account of the individual's previous vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be classed as a representative of the public. Each member shall have six or more years of recognized expertise in the field of workers' compensation, and at least one member shall be an attorney registered to practice law in this state. No more than two members of the industrial commission shall belong to or be affiliated with the same political party. (B) Within thirty days after the industrial commission nominating council submits its list to the governor under division (D) of this section, the governor shall make initial appointments to the commission. Of the initial appointments, the member who is a representative of employees shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1995; the member who is a representative of employers shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1997; and the member who is a representative of the public shall serve a term ending on June 30, 1999. Thereafter, terms of office are for six years, beginning on the first day of July and ending on the thirtieth day of June. (C) Each member shall hold office from the date of the member's confirmation by the senate, as provided in division (E) of this section, until the end of the term for which the member was appointed, except that if a member has not been appointed by the end of the term, the member shall remain in office until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. However, if a member is appointed to fill a full term subsequent to an initial appointment, the term of office is as provided in division (B) of this section. The governor shall not appoint any person to more than two full six-year terms of office on the commission. This restriction does not prevent the governor from appointing a person to fill a vacancy caused by death, resignation, or removal of a commission member, or from appointing that person twice to full terms on the commission, or from appointing a person previously appointed to fill less than a full term twice to full terms on the commission. Except for the public member's tenure as chairperson of the self-insuring employer's evaluation board, a member of the commission shall hold no other office of trust or profit, engage in any other occupation or business, or serve on any committee of any political party and shall devote full time to the member's duties as a member of the commission. (D) In making appointments to the commission, the governor shall select the members from the list of the names submitted by the industrial commission nominating council pursuant to this division. Within thirty days after October 20, 1993, the nominating council shall submit to the governor for the initial appointments a list containing three separate names for the employer, employee, and public members to be filled. Within seven days of the submission of the initial list, the governor shall either appoint individuals from the list or request the nominating council to submit another list of three names for each member the governor has not appointed from the original list, which list the nominating council shall submit to the governor within seven days of the governor's request. The governor then shall appoint, within seven days of the submission of the second list, individuals from either list to fill each position for which the governor has not made an appointment from the original list. Thereafter, within sixty days of a vacancy occurring as a result of the expiration of a term and within thirty days after other vacancies occurring on the commission, the nominating council shall submit an initial list containing three names for each vacancy. Within seven days of the submission of the initial list, the governor shall either appoint individuals from the list or request the nominating council to submit another list of three names for each member the governor has not appointed from the original list, which list the nominating council shall submit to the governor within fourteen days of the governor's request. The governor then shall appoint, within seven days of the submission of the second list, one of the individuals from either list to fill the vacancy for which the governor has not made an appointment from the original list. In order for a name of an individual to be submitted to the governor under this division, the nominating council shall approve the individual by an affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds of its members. (E) The governor shall notify the senate of the names of the individuals for whom the governor is making the initial appointments to the commission within thirty days after the submission of the names to the governor by the industrial commission nominating council under division (D) of this section. For appointments subsequent to the initial appointments under this division, if the appointment is to fill a member's term which is to expire, the governor shall notify the senate of the name of the individual to be appointed to fill that position by no later than the first day of June of the year that the term is to expire. For subsequent appointments to fill a vacancy on the commission occurring as a result of the death, resignation, or removal of the commission member, the governor shall notify the senate of the name of the individual to be appointed to fill the remainder of that term within thirty days after the submission of the names to the governor by the nominating council under division (D) of this section. For all appointments, the senate shall refer the matter to an appropriate standing committee for consideration of the appointments, and the committee shall hold a public hearing to consider the appointments. After conclusion of the public hearing, the standing committee shall make its recommendations to the senate. The senate shall not confirm any appointee if the individual does not meet the qualifications of division (A) of this section or if the individual has not been approved by the industrial commission nominating council as provided in division (D) of this section. If the full senate fails to take a final vote on an appointment within thirty days after the governor submits the names to the senate under this division, the individual's appointment is deemed confirmed by the senate and the individual shall take the office of commission member subject to removal as provided in division (F) of this section. (F) The governor may remove or suspend a member of the commission pursuant to section 3.04 of the Revised Code. The governor shall notify the senate of any decision to remove or suspend a commission member. The senate shall refer the matter to an appropriate standing committee for consideration and the committee shall hold a public hearing to consider the matter. At the hearing, the governor or the governor's authorized representative may present evidence and give testimony in support of the decision. The commission member or the member's authorized representatives may appear and present evidence and testimony. After conclusion of the public hearing, the committee shall make its recommendation to the senate. Upon receipt of a recommendation from the standing committee, the senate shall vote on the issue of whether to advise and consent to the removal or suspension of the member. The senate shall vote on the matter within sixty legislative days from the date the governor communicates the decision to remove or suspend the member. (G) The governor shall determine the compensation of the members of the commission, based upon such facts as the governor considers appropriate, provided that the salary of each member shall be no less than seventy-five thousand dollars per year. In addition, each commission member shall receive an annual salary increase based upon the average salary increases of other state department directors for that year, not to exceed five per cent per year. The salary of a member of the commission appointed on or after the effective date of this amendment is subject to division (E) of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. (H) Before entering upon the duties of office, each member shall take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and swear and affirm that the member holds no position under any committee of a political party, which oath or affirmation the member shall file in the office of the governor. Each member shall give a bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars, which bond shall be approved by the governor and filed with the treasurer of state. All employees or deputies of the commission who receive or disburse state funds shall give a bond to the state in the amounts and surety approved by the industrial commission. (I) As used in this section only, "office of trust or profit" means: (1) A federal or state elective office or an elected office of a political subdivision of the state; (2) A position on a board or commission of the state that is appointed by the governor; (3) An office set forth in section 121.03, 121.04, or 121.05 of the Revised Code; (4) An office of the government of the United States that is appointed by the president of the United States. Sec. 4905.10. (A) For the sole purpose of maintaining and administering the public utilities commission and exercising its supervision and jurisdiction over the railroads and public utilities of this state, an amount equivalent to the appropriation from the public utilities fund created under division (B) of this section to the public utilities commission for railroad and public utilities regulation in each fiscal year shall be apportioned among and assessed against each railroad and public utility within this state by the commission by first computing an assessment as though it were to be made in proportion to the intrastate gross earnings or receipts, excluding earnings or receipts from sales to other public utilities for resale, of the railroad or public utility for the calendar year next preceding that in which the assessment is made. The commission may include in that first computation any amount of a railroad's or public utility's intrastate gross earnings or receipts that were underreported in a prior year. In addition to whatever penalties apply under the Revised Code to such underreporting, the commission shall assess the railroad or public utility interest at the rate stated in division (A) of section 1343.01 of the Revised Code. The commission shall deposit any interest so collected into the public utilities fund. The commission may exclude from that first computation any such amounts that were overreported in a prior year. The final computation of the assessment shall consist of imposing upon each railroad and public utility whose assessment under the first computation would have been one hundred dollars or less an assessment of one hundred dollars and recomputing the assessments of the remaining railroads and public utilities by apportioning an amount equal to the appropriation to the public utilities commission for administration of the utilities division in each fiscal year less the total amount to be recovered from those paying the minimum assessment, in proportion to the intrastate gross earnings or receipts of the remaining railroads and public utilities for the calendar year next preceding that in which the assessments are made. In the case of an assessment based on intrastate gross receipts under this section against a public utility that is an electric utility as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, or an electric services company, electric cooperative, or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, such receipts shall be those specified in the utility's, company's, cooperative's, or aggregator's most recent report of intrastate gross receipts and sales of kilowatt hours of electricity, filed with the commission pursuant to division (F) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code, and verified by the commission. In the case of an assessment based on intrastate gross receipts under this section against a retail natural gas supplier or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4929.20 of the Revised Code, such receipts shall be those specified in the supplier's or aggregator's most recent report of intrastate gross receipts and sales of hundred cubic feet of natural gas, filed with the commission pursuant to division (B) of section 4929.23 of the Revised Code, and verified by the commission. However, no such retail natural gas supplier or such governmental aggregator serving or proposing to serve customers of a particular natural gas company, as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, shall be assessed under this section until after the commission, pursuant to section 4905.26 or 4909.18 of the Revised Code, has removed from the base rates of the natural gas company the amount of assessment under this section that is attributable to the value of commodity sales service, as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, in the base rates paid by those customers of the company that do not purchase that service from the natural gas company. (B) Through calendar year 2005, on or before the first day of October in each year, the commission shall notify each such railroad and public utility of the sum assessed against it, whereupon payment shall be made to the commission, which shall deposit it into the state treasury to the credit of the public utilities fund, which is hereby created. Beginning in calendar year 2006, on or before the fifteenth day of May in each year, the commission shall notify each railroad and public utility that had a sum assessed against it for the current fiscal year of more than one thousand dollars that fifty per cent of that amount shall be paid to the commission by the twentieth day of June of that year as an initial payment of the assessment against the company for the next fiscal year. On or before the first day of October in each year, the commission shall make a final determination of the sum of the assessment against each railroad and public utility and shall notify each railroad and public utility of the sum assessed against it. The commission shall deduct from the assessment for each railroad or public utility any initial payment received. Payment of the assessment shall be made to the commission by the first day of November of that year. The commission shall deposit the payments received into the state treasury to the credit of the public utilities fund. Any such amounts paid into the fund but not expended by the commission shall be credited ratably, after first deducting any deficits accumulated from prior years, by the commission to railroads and public utilities that pay more than the minimum assessment, according to the respective portions of such sum assessable against them for the ensuing fiscal year. The assessments for such fiscal year shall be reduced correspondingly. (C) Within five days after the beginning of each fiscal year through fiscal year 2006, the director of budget and management shall transfer from the general revenue fund to the public utilities fund an amount sufficient for maintaining and administering the public utilities commission and exercising its supervision and jurisdiction over the railroads and public utilities of the state during the first four months of the fiscal year. The director shall transfer the same amount back to the general revenue fund from the public utilities fund at such time as the director determines that the balance of the public utilities fund is sufficient to support the appropriations from the fund for the fiscal year. The director may transfer less than that amount if the director determines that the revenues of the public utilities fund during the fiscal year will be insufficient to support the appropriations from the fund for the fiscal year, in which case the amount not paid back to the general revenue fund shall be payable to the general revenue fund in future fiscal years. (D) For the purpose of this section only, "public utility" includes: (1) In addition to an electric utility as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, an electric services company, an electric cooperative, or a governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, to the extent of the company's, cooperative's, or aggregator's engagement in the business of supplying or arranging for the supply in this state of any retail electric service for which it must be so certified; (2) In addition to a natural gas company as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, a retail natural gas supplier or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4929.20 of the Revised Code, to the extent of the supplier's or aggregator's engagement in the business of supplying or arranging for the supply in this state of any competitive retail natural gas service for which it must be certified. (E) Each public utilities commissioner shall receive a salary fixed at the level set by pay range 49 under schedule E-2 and division (E) of section 124.152 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 124.15, 124.152, 3328.15, 3333.01, 3770.02, 4121.02, and 4905.10 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.